Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-603
Pupil transportation vehicles; safety features; violations; penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of section 79-602 or who drives, moves, or causes or knowingly permits to be moved on any highway any vehicle or vehicles which exceed the limitations as to the safety features provided in such section for which a penalty is not elsewhere provided shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

For purposes of this section, highway shall have the meaning provided in section 60-624.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 479;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-488.01;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 364.